Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4415
Local sources of revenue; use.

All local sources of revenue established for a good life district economic development program, and received for such program, shall be deposited in the applicable good life district economic development fund of the city when received. Any funds in the good life district economic development fund may be appropriated and spent for eligible costs of the good life district economic development program in any amount and at any time at the discretion and direction of the governing body of the city.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 8.